Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that the legislature shall not pass local or special laws authorizing the creation, extension or impairing of liens, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.

As to lien of judgment and enforcement by execution, see §§

1-17-301

to

1-17-345

.

As to liens for delinquent contributions under unemployment compensation, see §

27-3-510

.

For provision that a mortgage or other specific lien on real property shall take precedence over lien of taxes levied against any other property and the property subject to such lien, see §

34-2-124

.

As to secured transactions generally, see §§ 34.1-9-101 to 34.1-9-709.

As to lien upon reservoirs, irrigation systems and ditches, see §

36-7-326

.

As to liens in connection with water rights relative to Carey Act lands, see §§

36-7-501

to

36-7-510

.

As to right of laborers, mechanics, farmers and other persons performing work or labor, or furnishing materials, etc., with reference to railroad construction, to file verified statement of account with railroad and collect the same from contractor through railroad, see §§

37-9-602

,

37-9-603

.

Revision of title. —

Sections 1 and 2, ch. 17, Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., revised this title, creating §§

29-1-201

,

29-1-304

through 20-1-309 and

29-7-301

, and amending and renumbering former W.S. 1977, §§

29-1-101

through

29-7-106

as §§

29-1-101

,

29-1-102

,

29-1-301

through

29-1-303

,

29-2-101

through

29-7-207

. No detailed explanation of the changes made by ch. 17, Laws 1981, Sp. Sess. have been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where it was felt they would be helpful. See the tables of comparative sections in Volume 11.